Washington statutes.
RCW 7.16.120

Questions involving merits to be determined.

The questions involving the merits to be determined by the court upon the hearing are:

(1) Whether the body or officer had jurisdiction of the subject matter of the determination under review.

(2) Whether the authority, conferred upon the body or officer in relation to that subject matter, has been pursued in the mode required by law, in order to authorize it or to make the determination.

(3) Whether, in making the determination, any rule of law affecting the rights of the parties thereto has been violated to the prejudice of the relator.

(4) Whether there was any competent proof of all the facts necessary to be proved, in order to authorize the making of the determination.

(5) Whether the factual determinations were supported by substantial evidence.

[ 1989 c 7 s 1; 1957 c 51 s 6; 1895 c 65 s 12; RRS s 1010.]